North Carolina, session 2025, HB21.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(q3) Autism Spectrum Disorder Designation. – The Division shall develop, in consultation
with the Department of Public Safety, the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities,
and Substance Use Services, and the State Highway Patrol, and pursuant to this subsection, a
drivers license designation that may, upon request, be granted to a person with autism spectrum
disorder, as defined in G.S. 58-3-192. The Division shall comply with the following requirements
applicable to the designation:
(1) At the request of a person with autism spectrum disorder, the Division shall
enter the designation into the electronic record associated with the person's
drivers license.
(2) For the purposes of this subsection, a person shall be considered to have
autism spectrum disorder if the person provides verification or documentation
substantiating a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder that is recommended
by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance
Use Services as acceptable. The Division of Motor Vehicles shall consult with
the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance
Use Services to identify acceptable forms of verification that do not result in
undue burden to the person requesting the designation of autism spectrum
disorder. Acceptable documentation shall include any of the following:
a. Documentation of certification or examination by a medical, health, or
mental health professional showing evidence of autism spectrum
disorder.
b. Documentation deemed by the Division of Motor Vehicles to qualify
as satisfactory proof of the person's autism spectrum disorder.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing the issuance of a
drivers license to a person ineligible under G.S. 20-9.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting the issuance of a
drivers license to a person otherwise eligible under the law.
(5) Any individual who chooses to register or not to register shall not be deemed
to have waived any protections under the law.
*H21-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Information collected under this subsection shall only be available to law
enforcement and only for the purpose of ensuring mutually safe interactions
between law enforcement and persons with autism spectrum disorder. It shall
not be accessed or used for any other purpose.
(7) The right to make the decision for inclusion or removal of the designation
from the database is entirely voluntary and shall only be made by the person
who holds the drivers license associated with the designation.
(8) The Division, in conjunction with the Department of Health and Human
Services, shall develop a process for removal of the designation authorized by
this subsection that is available online, by mail, or in person."
SECTION 2. G.S. 17C-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17C-6. Powers of Commission.
(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(17) Establish minimum educational and training standards for employment and
continuing education for criminal justice officers concerning:concerning both
of the following:
a. Recognizing and appropriately interacting with (i) persons who are
deaf or hard of hearing.hearing and (ii) persons with autism spectrum
disorder.
b. Drivers license and vehicle registration identifiers of (i) persons who
are deaf or hard of hearing, as authorized by G.S. 20-7(q2), or (ii)
persons with autism spectrum disorder, as authorized by
G.S. 20-7(q3), including that those identifiers are optional.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 17E-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17E-4. Powers and duties of the Commission.
(a) The Commission shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities, which
are enforceable through its rules and regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of
G.S. 17E-8 and G.S. 17E-9:
…
(13) Establish minimum educational and training standards for employment and
continuing education for officers concerning:concerning both of the
following:
a. Recognizing and appropriately interacting with (i) persons who are
deaf or hard of hearing.hearing and (ii) persons with autism spectrum
disorder.
b. Drivers license and vehicle registration identifiers of (i) persons who
are deaf or hard of hearing, as authorized by G.S. 20-7(q2), or (ii)
persons with autism spectrum disorder, as authorized by
G.S. 20-7(q3), including that those identifiers are optional.
…."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to autism
spectrum disorder designation requests made on or after January 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 21-First Edition